Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 6 Exercise of Powers of Appointment and Sale

23-2-110.
Equitable jurisdiction over powers.

Powers, especially of appointment, being always founded on trust or confidence, are peculiarly subjects of equitable supervision.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3097; Code 1868, § 3109; Code 1873, § 3166; Code 1882, § 3166; Civil Code 1895, § 4017; Civil Code 1910, § 4614; Code 1933, § 37-601.

23-2-111.
Exercise of discretionary powers not compellable generally.

Equity may not compel a party, having a discretion, to exercise a power of appointment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3098; Code 1868, § 3110; Code 1873, § 3167; Code 1882, § 3167; Civil Code 1895, § 4018; Civil Code 1910, § 4615; Code 1933, § 37-602.

23-2-112.
When faithful execution of power compellable.

In all cases where no discretion is allowed or the discretion allowed is abused, equity may compel a faithful execution of the power.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3102; Code 1868, § 3114; Code 1873, § 3171; Code 1882, § 3171; Civil Code 1895, § 4022; Civil Code 1910, § 4619; Code 1933, § 37-606.

23-2-113.
When equity may relieve against collusive, illusory, mistaken, etc., executions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Collusive execution” means every execution whereby the person exercising a power uses it by contrivance for his own benefit, he not being legitimately an intended beneficiary.

“Illusory appointment” means an appointment whereby a nominal benefit only is given to one of a class, to all of whom a substantial benefit was intended.

Equity may relieve against mistaken or defective executions, collusive executions, and illusory appointments.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3098, 3099, 3100; Code 1868, §§ 3110, 3111, 3112; Code 1873, §§ 3167, 3168, 3169; Code 1882, §§ 3167, 3168, 3169; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4018, 4019, 4020; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4615, 4616, 4617; Code 1933, §§ 37-602, 37-603, 37-604.

23-2-114.
Powers of sale to be construed strictly; manner of sale; who may exercise.

Powers of sale in deeds of trust, mortgages, and other instruments shall be strictly construed and shall be fairly exercised. In the absence of stipulations to the contrary in the instrument, the time, place, and manner of sale shall be that pointed out for public sales. Unless the instrument creating the power specifically provides to the contrary, a personal representative, heir, heirs, legatee, devisee, or successor of the grantee in a mortgage, deed of trust, deed to secure debt, bill of sale to secure debt, or other like instrument, or an assignee thereof, or his personal representative, heir, heirs, legatee, devisee, or successor may exercise any power therein contained; and such powers may so be exercised regardless of whether or not the transfer specifically includes the powers or conveys title to the property described. A power of sale not revocable by death of the grantor or donor may be exercised after his death in the same manner and to the same extent as though the grantor or donor were in life; and it shall not be necessary in the exercise of the power to advertise or sell as the property of the estate of the deceased nor to make any mention of or reference to the death.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4023; Civil Code 1910, § 4620; Code 1933, § 37-607; Ga. L. 1937, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 735, § 1.

History of Code section.

The first two sentences of this Code section are derived from the decision in
Calloway v. People’s Bank,

54 Ga. 441

(1875).

Cross references.

Rules of construction to promote purposes and policies, §

11-1-103

.

Operation of “open-end” clauses in real estate mortgages and deeds to secure debt, §

44-14-1

.

Barring of power of sale in conveyance of real property to secure debt, see §

44-14-81

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on real property law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 345 (2008).

For article, “Buying Distressed Commercial Real Estate:
What are the Alternatives?,” see 16 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 18 (2010).

23-2-115.
When private sale authorized.

Unless expressly limited in a will, deed, or other instrument creating a power of sale or unless specifically otherwise provided in such instrument, a power of sale conferred upon an executor, trustee, guardian, or attorney in fact shall authorize a private sale by the executor, trustee, guardian, or attorney in fact, with or without advertisement and on such terms and conditions as the donee of the power may deem advisable, without the necessity of applying for leave to sell or obtaining any order therefor from any court; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to powers of sale in security deeds, mortgages, trust deeds, bills of sale, and other instruments conveying property or creating a lien thereon, to secure a debt or debts.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 430, § 1.

23-2-116.
When powers of sale exercisable by successor administrator, trustee, or guardian.

Unless expressly limited in an instrument creating a power of sale or unless specifically otherwise provided in the instrument, the power of sale conferred upon an executor, trustee, or guardian may be exercised and executed by an administrator with the will annexed or by a successor administrator, trustee, or guardian. If the power is conferred upon more than one executor, trustee, or guardian, the surviving or remaining executor or executors, trustee or trustees, or guardian or guardians may exercise and execute the power.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 430, § 2.

23-2-117.
When release, relinquishment, or covenant as to exercise of power of appointment authorized.

Any person holding a power of appointment, general or special, whether exercisable by deed or by will only or otherwise, and whether reserved by the holder of the power or conferred upon him by another, may, as to all or any part of the property covered by the power of appointment, release or relinquish the power completely, or may release or relinquish the right to exercise the power except among a limited class set out in the release or relinquishment, or may covenant that the power will be exercised only in favor of the members of a limited class; and any such release, relinquishment, or covenant executed and delivered as provided in Code Sections 23-2-118 and 23-2-119 shall be valid and binding, whether with or without a consideration, provided that no such release, relinquishment, or covenant shall have the effect of permitting the property to be appointed to a person not permitted by the original power.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 340, § 1.

23-2-118.
Release, relinquishment, or covenant as to exercise of power of appointment to be in writing; delivery or recordation.

Any release, relinquishment, or covenant referred to in Code Section 23-2-117 shall be in writing, signed by the person holding the power, and delivered to anyone interested in the power, including any person in the limited class, or to any fiduciary holding the property or any part thereof, or recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property or any part thereof is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 340, § 2.

23-2-119.
When fiduciaries or bona fide purchasers affected by release, relinquishment, or covenant as to exercise of power of appointment.

No fiduciary holding or distributing any property subject to a power of appointment as referred to in Code Section 23-2-117 shall be deemed to have notice of the release, relinquishment, or covenant or be bound thereby unless and until a copy thereof is delivered to the fiduciary. No bona fide purchaser purchasing the property shall be affected by the release, relinquishment, or covenant unless he has notice thereof or unless the release, relinquishment, or covenant has been recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 340, § 3.

23-2-120.
Application of Code Sections 23-2-117 through 23-2-119.

Code Sections 23-2-117 through 23-2-119 are declaratory of existing law and apply to all such releases, relinquishments, and covenants, whenever executed.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 340, § 4.